en: Base type: Boom arm; Caster wheel; Clamp; Folding tripod; Low-profile; Round; Round weighted; Tabletop; Tripod; Wall-mounted; Other
tr: Taban Türü: Bom kolu; Tekerlek; Kelepçe; Katlanır tripod; Düşük profilli; Yuvarlak; Yuvarlak ağırlıklı; Masaüstü; Tripod; Duvara monte; Diğer
cs: Typ základu: Rameno stojanu; Kolečko; Svorka; Skládací stativ; Nízký profil; Oválná; Kulatý vyvážený; Deska stolu; Stativ; Montáž na stěnu; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de bază: Braț de microfon; Rotilă; Colier; Trepied pliabil; Profil redus; Rotund; Rotund cu contragreutate; Blat de masă; Trepied; De perete; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo básico: Braço de lança; Rodízio; Braçadeira; Tripé dobrável; Baixo perfil; Redondo; Contrapeso redondo; Tampo de mesa; Tripé; Montado na parede; Outro
zh-TW: 基底類型: 桌邊架; 腳輪; 老虎鉗式; 可折疊三腳架; 次級品; 圓頭; 加權輪詢算法; 桌上型; 三腳架; 壁掛式; 其他
sl-SI: Osnovna vrsta: Mikrofonska palica; Koleščki; Objemka; Zložljiv stativ; Nizek profil; Okrogel; Okrogel obtežen; Namizen; Stativ; Montaža na steno; Drugo
zh-CN: 底座类型: 动臂; 脚轮; 夹钳; 折叠三脚架; 低轮廓; 圆头; 圆形加权; 桌面; 三脚架; 壁挂式; 其他
lt-LT: Laikiklio tipas: Stovo skersinis; Ratukas; Spaustukas; Sulenkiamas trikojis; Žemo profilio; Apvalus; Apvalus, sunkus; Stalviršis; Trikojis; Sieninis; Kita
bg-BG: Тип база: Регулируема стойка; Колелце; Скоба; Сгъваем статив; Нисък профил; Кръгла; Кръгло претеглен; Плот за маса; Статив; Стенен монтаж; Други
ja: ベースタイプ: ブームアーム; キャスターホイール; クランプ; 折りたたみ三脚; ロープロファイル; ラウンド; ラウンドウェイト; 卓上; 三脚; ウォールマウント; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta osnovice: Stalak za mikrofon; Kotač; Stezaljka; Sklopivi tronožac; Niskog profila; Okrugla; Okrugla ponderirana; Stolna ploča; Tronožac; Zidni; Ostalo
de: Basistyp: Auslegerarm; Lenkrolle; Zwinge; Klappbares Stativ; Flach; Rund; Rundgewichtet; Tischgerät; Dreibeinstativ; Wandmontage; Sonstiges
ru: Тип подставки: Стойка стрелы; Колесо поворотное; Зажим; Складной штатив; Низкопрофильный; Круглый; Круглый утяжеленный; Настольный; Штатив; Настенный; Другой
hu: Alap típusa: Mikrofonállvány; Görgő; Bilincs; Összecsukható állvány; Alacsony profilú; Kerek; Kerek, nehéz; Asztali; Háromlábú; Falra szerelhető; Egyéb
th: ประเภทฐาน: แขนบูม; ล้อเลื่อน; แคลมป์; ขาตั้งกล้องสามขาพับได้; แนบเนียบ; ทรงกลม; ถ่วงน้ำหนักแบบทรงกลม; วางของได้; แบบสามขา; ยึดกับผนัง; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος βάσης: Βραχίονας ανύψωσης; Τροχίσκος; Σφιγκτήρας; Πτυσσόμενο τρίποδο; Χαμηλό προφίλ; Στρογγυλό; Στρογγυλή βαριά; Επιτραπέζια; Τρίποδο; Επιτοίχια; Άλλο
vi: Loại chất nền: Cánh tay giá đỡ; Bánh xe caster; Kẹp; Chân máy gấp; Cấu hình thấp; Mũi giày tròn; Trọng lượng tròn; Trên mặt bàn; Giá ba chân; Treo tường; Khác
es: Tipo de base: Brazo de micrófono; Rueda giratoria; Pinza; Trípode plegable; Perfil bajo; Redondo; Redondo ponderado; Sobremesa; Trípode; Montaje en pared; Otros
da: Basetype: Bomarm; Svinghjul; Klemme; Sammenfoldeligt stativ; Lav profil; Rund; Rund vægtet; Bordplade; Stativ; Vægmonteret; Andet
fr: Type de base: Bras articulé; Roulette; Bride; Trépied pliant; Profile bas; Rond; Rond lesté; De table; Trépied; Support mural; Autre
sk-SK: Základný typ: Rameno výložníka; Otočné koliesko; Svorka; Skladací statív; Nízkoprofilový; Okrúhly; Okrúhly vážený; Stolová doska; Statív; Nástenný; Iné
pl: Typ podstawowy: Ramię wysięgnika; Kółko samonastawne; Zacisk; Statyw składany; Niskoprofilowy; Runda; Okrągły wyważony; Blat stołu; Trójnóg; Montowany na ścianie; Inne
fi: Pohjatyyppi: Puomivarsi; Pyörivä pyörä; Puristin; Taitettava kolmijalka; Matalaprofiilinen; Pyöreä; Pyöreä painotettu; Pöydällä pidettävä; Kolmijalka; Seinään kiinnitettävä; Muu
ko: 베이스 유형: 붐 암; 캐스터 휠; 클램프; 접이식 삼각대; 로우 프로파일; 라운드; 라운드 가중치; 테이블탑; 삼각대; 벽걸이형; 기타
nl: Basistype: Boomarm; Zwenkwiel; Klem; Opklapbaar statief; Laag profiel; Rond; Rond gewogen; Tafelblad; Statief; Wandbevestiging; Andere
it: Tipo di basamento: Braccio asta; Ruota piroettante; Morsetto; Treppiede pieghevole; Basso profilo; Rotondo; Rotondo ponderato; Da tavolo; Treppiedi; Montato a parete; Altro
sv: Bastyp: Bomarm; Svänghjul; Klämma; Fällbart stativ; Låg profil; Rund; Rund viktad; Bordsskiva; Stativ; Väggmonterad; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de base: Braço de suporte; Roda giratória; Grampo; Tripé dobrável; Baixo perfil; Redondo; Rodado ponderado; Tampo de mesa; Tripé; Com suporte de parede; Outro
nb: Grunntype: Bomarm; Svinghjul; Klemme; Sammenleggbart stativ; Lav profil; Rund; Rundt vektet; Bordplate; Stativ; Veggfeste; Annet